Utah statutes.
7-7-42.   Members, stockholders or employees not disqualified to take acknowledgments or proofs.

No public officer qualified to take acknowledgments or proofs of written instruments shall be disqualified from taking the acknowledgment or proof of any instrument in writing in which an association is interested by reason of being a member or stockholder in or being employed by an association so interested, and acknowledgments and proofs of such instruments heretofore taken are hereby validated.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

